Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.350

Health professionals.

(1) The federal social security number of individuals governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of health is exempt from disclosure under this chapter. The exemption in this section does not apply to requests made directly to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of government, and national and state licensing, credentialing, investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations.

(2) The current residential address and current residential telephone number of a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department are exempt from disclosure under this chapter, if the provider requests that this information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and provides to the department of health an accurate alternate or business address and business telephone number. The current residential address and residential telephone number of a health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the files of the department of health shall automatically be withheld from public inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the information be released, and except as provided for under *RCW 42.56.070(9).

[ 2005 c 274 s 415.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 42.56.070 was amended by 2017 c 304 s 1, changing subsection (9) to subsection (8).